Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201754-1,105
Brands; distinction requirements.

(1) Cattle branded with a Nebraska-recorded visual brand shall be branded so that the recorded brand of the owner shows distinctly.

(2) If the owners of recorded brands which conflict with or closely resemble each other maintain their herds in close proximity to each other, the Nebraska Brand Committee has the authority to decide, after hearing as to which at least ten days' written notice has been given, any dispute arising therefrom and to direct such change or changes in the position or positions where such recorded brand or brands are to be placed as will remove any confusion that might result from such conflict or close resemblance.

Laws 1999, LB 778, § 36;

Laws 2002, LB 589, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB600, § 8.